North Carolina, session 2025, HB655.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-210.4 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(2b) As part of the annual report and presentation required under subdivision (2a)
of this section, the Council shall include information on public school
mascots. This information shall include (i) a definition of what the Council
finds to be an American Indian mascot and (ii) a list of all known public
schools with an American Indian mascot and what the mascot for that school
is."
SECTION 2. G.S. 115C-12 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(50) To Monitor School Mascots. – The State Board of Education shall ensure that
no public school in the State uses an American Indian mascot, as defined
pursuant to G.S. 115C-210.4(2b). Within 30 days of the presentation of the
annual report by the State Advisory Council on Indian Education pursuant to
G.S. 115C-210.4, the State Board shall vote on whether it concurs or objects
with the Council's finding that a school is using an American Indian mascot.
If the State Board concurs with the Council's determination, the State Board
shall notify the governing body and the superintendent, or equivalent
authority, of the public school unit of the determination and direct that the
school's mascot be changed to a non-American Indian mascot within two
years."
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 115C-276 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(u) To Monitor School Mascots. – The superintendent shall ensure that no school in a
public school unit has an American Indian mascot. If the superintendent has received notice
pursuant to G.S. 115C-12(50) that a school's mascot must be changed, the superintendent may
give the relevant authorities under existing school or local board policy one year to initiate the
process of changing the mascot. If no action has been taken to change the mascot within one year
of receiving notice to change the mascot, the superintendent shall have authority to choose a new
mascot for the school. If the school continues to have an American Indian mascot two years after
receiving notice to change the mascot, the Department of Public Instruction shall determine if
the superintendent willfully failed to comply with the requirements of this section and
G.S. 115C-12(50). If the Department finds that the superintendent willfully failed to comply, no
*H655-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
State funds shall be allocated to pay the superintendent's salary until the mascot is changed and
the Department determines the superintendent is in compliance."
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 115C-218.75 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(p) To Monitor School Mascots. – A charter school shall not have an American Indian
mascot. If a charter school has received notice pursuant to G.S. 115C-12(50) that the school is
using an American Indian mascot, the school must change the mascot to a non-American Indian
mascot within two years of receiving the notice. If the charter school has not changed the mascot
within two years of receiving notice to change the mascot, the State Board shall determine if the
charter school willfully failed to comply with the requirements of G.S. 115C-12(50). If the State
Board finds that the school willfully failed to comply, the State Board shall withhold a per pupil
equivalent of the salary of the superintendent of the local school administrative unit in which the
charter school is located for each student in membership according to the allotted average daily
membership for that year."
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 House Bill 655-First Edition